Wyoming, session 2025, HB0143.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 99-3-2904(j)(iv) through (vi) is
amended to read:

99-3-2904. Level III construction projects
rehabilitation.

(j) Project LaPrele Dam Rehabilitation:

HB0143

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0454
(iv) Total project budget: One hundred eighteen
million dollars ($118,000,000.00) One hundred eighty-two
million dollars ($182,000,000.00);

(v) Project grant: The state of Wyoming shall
grant to the sponsor from water development account II
through the commission for the design and construction of
the project an amount not to exceed thirty million dollars
($30,000,000.00) ninety million dollars ($90,000,000.00) or
one hundred percent (100%) of these actual development
costs, whichever is less;

(vi) Appropriation:

(A) 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 74,
Section 1(a)(iii), as amended, appropriated thirty million
dollars ($30,000,000.00) to the commission to carry out the
purpose of this subsection;.

(B) There is appropriated from water
development account II to the commission sixty million
dollars ($60,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is necessary
to carry out the purpose of this subsection. Unexpended
HB0143

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0454
funds appropriated under this subsection shall revert to
the legislative stabilization reserve account on July 1,
2032.

Section 2. There is appropriated sixty million
dollars ($60,000,000.00) from the legislative stabilization
reserve account to water development account II, created by
W.S. 41-2-124(a)(ii).

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0143